Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1489
Lobbyist; records and documents; preservation required; available to commission; exception.

Each lobbyist shall obtain and preserve all accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers, and documents necessary to substantiate the statements required to be made pursuant to section 49-1483 for three years after the report containing those items is filed. These records shall be made available for inspection upon request by the commission after reasonable notice. Nothing in this section shall require that a receipt for any food and drink expenditure be kept if such expenditure is in an amount of less than twenty-five dollars.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 89;

Laws 1977, LB 4, § 3.